src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MITTUINE !!= @CODE@ mittuinetahto:mittu
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl:%>malpäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ade:%>mal TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+All:%>male TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela:%>maspäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ess:%>mannu TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen:%>man TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill:%>mah TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine:%>mas TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:ine TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Par:%>mua TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Tra:%>makse TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl:%>milpäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ade:%>mil TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+All:%>mile TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela:%>mispäi TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ess:%>minnu TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen:%>mien TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill:%>mih TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine:%>mis TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom:%>mat TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Par:%>mii TAHTO/LIENNE ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl+Tra:%>mikse TAHTO/LIENNE ;

LEXICON TAHTO/LIENNE
:»lienne K ;
:»tahto K ;
:»tah K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIMI !!= @CODE@ nimi:ni«mi
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Nom:t K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ela:späi K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Gen:n K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ill:h K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ine:s K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Par:dä K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Tra:kse K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIKEN !!= @CODE@ niken:ni«ke
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Abl:lpäi K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ade:l K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+All:lle K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Com:nenke K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ela:nespäi K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Gen:nen K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ill:neh K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ine:nes K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Nom:n K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Par:dä K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Tra:nekse K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIMITTUINE !!= @CODE@ nimittuine:ni«mittu
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Abl:%>malpäi K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ade:%>mal K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+All:%>male K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ela:%>maspäi K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ess:%>mannu K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Gen:%>man K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ill:%>mah K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ine:%>mas K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Nom:ine K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Sg+Par:%>mua K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Abl:%>milpäi K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ade:%>mil K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+All:%>mile K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ela:%>mispäi K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ess:%>minnu K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Gen:%>mien K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ill:%>mih K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ine:%>mis K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Nom:%>mat K ;
+Pron+Indef+Neg+Pl+Par:%>mii K ;


!! !INTERROGATIVE
LEXICON PRON-INTERR_ !!= @CODE@ Still requires work
+Pron+Interr: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_MI !!= @CODE@ mi:mi
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:t K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:späi K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:n K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:h K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:s K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:dä K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Tra:kse K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_MITTUINE !!= @CODE@ mittuine:mittu
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl:%>malpäi K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ade:%>mal K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+All:%>male K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:%>maspäi K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ess:%>mannu K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:%>man K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:%>mah K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:%>mas K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:ine K ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:%>mua K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl:%>milpäi K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ade:%>mil K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+All:%>mile K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela:%>mispäi K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ess:%>minnu K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen:%>mien K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill:%>mih K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine:%>mis K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:%>mat K ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Par:%>mii K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_KEN !!= @CODE@ ken:ke
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Hum: PRON-INTERR_KEN-01 ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_KEN-01
+Sg+Ade:l K ;
+Sg+All:lle K ;
+Sg+Com:nenke K ;
+Sg+Gen:nen K ;
+Sg+Nom:n K ;
+Sg+Par:%>dä K ;
+Pl+Nom:t K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_KARJALAINE
+Pron+Interr:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

!! !REFLEXIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-REFL_ !!= __@CODE@__ iče:ičče
+Pron+Refl+Abl:%^WGStem%>lpäi K ; 
+Pron+Refl+Ade:%^WGStem%>l K ; 
+Pron+Refl+All:%^WGStem%>le K ;
+Pron+Refl+All+PxSg1:%^WGStem%>lleni K ;
+Pron+Refl+All+PxSg2:%^WGStem%>lles K ;
+Pron+Refl+All+PxSg3:%^WGStem%>lleh K ;
+Pron+Refl+Ess:%^WGStem%>nny K ;
+Pron+Refl+Ess+PxSg3:%>näh K ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen:%^WGStem%>n K ;
+Pron+Refl+Ill:%>h K ;
+Pron+Refl+Ine:%^WGStem%>s K ;
+Pron+Refl+Nom:%^WGStem K ;
+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxSg1:%>ni K ;
+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxSg2:%>s K ;
+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxSg3:%>h K ;
+Pron+Refl+Par+PxSg1:%>ed%{AÄ%}ni K ;
+Pron+Refl+Par+PxSg2:%>ed%{AÄ%}s K ;
+Pron+Refl+Par+PxSg3:%>ed%{AÄ%}h K ;
+Pron+Refl+Tra+PxSg3:%^WGStem%>kseh K ;
!! iččiedäh, iččedäh, iččeh, ičes, iččenäh, iččiedäs, iččeni,


!! !RELATIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-REL_KUDAI !!= @CODE@ kudai:kuda
+Pron+Rel:%{back%} NMN_KUDAI ;
+Pron+Rel:%{back%} NMN_PIIRAI ; !2015-05-21

LEXICON PRON-REFL_IS-SG-PAR
+Pron+Refl+Sg+Par: K ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg+Par+PxSg3:däh K ;

LEXICON PRON_ARMAS !!= @CODE@ armas:arma
+Pron:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS        ;

LEXICON PRON_OZA !!= @CODE@ oza:oza
+Pron:%{back%} NMN_OZA        ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT_KIELI !!= @CODE@ kieli:kiel
+Pron+Qnt:%{front%} NMN_SUARI/KIELI ;

LEXICON PRON_KARJALAINE
+Pron:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON PRON_KIELINE
+Pron:%{front%} NMN_NAINE/KIELINE ;

LEXICON PRON_TOINE !!= @CODE@ toine:to
+Pron:%{back%} NMN_TOINE ;

LEXICON PRON_KAI !!= @CODE@ requires developing
+Pron:%{back%} PRON_KAI_01 ;
LEXICON PRON_KAI_01
+Pl+Nom: K ;
+Pl+Gen:kkien K ;
+Pl+All:kile K ;
+Pl+Abl:kilpäi K ;
+Pl+Abl:kil K ;
+Pl+Ade:kil K ;
+Sg+Gen:ken K ;
+Sg+Ine:kes K ;
+Sg+Ela:kes K ;
+Sg+Ela:kespäi K ;
+Sg+Ade:kel K ;
+Sg+Abl:kel K ;
+Sg+Abl:kelpäi K ;

LEXICON PRON_ENÄMBI
+Pron:%{front%} NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
