src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
jogahine:jogahi PRON_KIELINE  "jokainen" ;
iččie:iččie PRON-REFL_IS-SG-PAR  "itseään" ;
vai% eräs:vai% erä PRON_ARMAS  "harva" ;
äijä:äijä PRON_OZA  "monet" ;
meigäläine:meigälä PRON_KARJALAINE  "meikäläinen" ;
kai:kai PRON_KAI  "kaikki" ;
ken:ke PRON-INTERR_KEN  "kuka" ;
toine:to PRON_TOINE  "toinen" ;
kunne:kunne PRON-INTERR_  "minne" ;
iče:ičče PRON-REFL_  "itse" ;
kudai:kuda PRON-REL_KUDAI  "joka" ;
kugalaine:kugala PRON-INTERR_KARJALAINE  "mistä kotoisin oleva" ;
mi:mi PRON-INTERR_MI  "mikä" ;
moni:mon PRON-QNT_KIELI  "moni" ;
nimidä:nimi PRON-INDEF_NIMI  "" ;
eräs:erä PRON_ARMAS  "" ;
enämbi:enämb PRON_ENÄMBI  "enempi" ;
